Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-573
Violations; penalty.

(1) Any person who violates subsection (1) of section 37-572 is guilty of a Class II misdemeanor, shall pay a fine of not less than two hundred fifty dollars for a first offense and not less than five hundred dollars for each subsequent offense, and shall not hunt, fish, or trap in this state for a period of not less than one year from the date of sentencing.

(2) Any person who violates subsection (2) of section 37-572 is guilty of a Class II misdemeanor and shall pay a fine of not less than two hundred fifty dollars for a first offense and not less than five hundred dollars for each subsequent offense. Each unlawful transaction, offer, or transfer of wildlife for any consideration, or possession of contraband described in section 37-572 with the intent to transact, offer, or transfer wildlife for any consideration in connection with hunting through the Internet is a separate offense. Any person who violates subsection (2) of section 37-572 shall not hunt, fish, or trap for a period of not less than one year from the date of sentencing.

Laws 2007, LB504, § 4.